en: Cord fastening system: Carabiner; Hook; Toggle ball; Other
hr-HR: Sustav fiksiranja konopa: Karabiner; Kuka; Kuglica s presjekom; Ostalo
cs: Systém upevnění lanka: Karabina; Hák; Přepínací kulička; Jiné
fr: Système de fixation: Mousqueton; Crochet; Boule à bascule; Autre
nl: Koordbevestigingssysteem: Karabijnhaak; Haak; Wisselbal; Andere
hu: Zsinóros rögzítőrendszer: Karabiner; Horog; Váltókapcsoló; Egyéb
sk-SK: Šnúrový sťahovací systém: Karabína; Háčik; Napínacia guma s loptičkou; Iné
es: Sistema de sujeción de cuerda: Mosquetón; Gancho; Bola basculante; Otros
nb: Kabelfestesystem: Karabinkrok; Krok; Låseknapp; Annet
ru: Система крепления шнура: Карабин; Крюк; Шарик-переключатель; Другое
zh-CN: 绳索紧固系统: 登山扣; 钩子; 套索球; 其他
fi: Johdon kiinnitysjärjestelmä: Jousihaka; Koukku; Pallokiinnitin; Muu
lt-LT: Gumos tvirtinimo sistema: Karabinu; Kabliuku; Užtraukiamu karoliuku; Kita
ko: 코드 체결 시스템: 카라비너; 후크; 토글볼; 기타
tr: Kordon Sabitleme Sistemi: Karabina; Kanca; Değiştirme topu; Diğer
de: Kordelbefestigungssystem: Karabiner; Haken; Knebelkugel; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 繩索緊固系統: 登山扣; 鉤子; 豬鼻扣; 其他
bg-BG: Система за връзване на въжета: Карабинер; Кука; Топка за превключване; Други
sl-SI: Sistem pritrjevanja vrvi: Vponka; Kavelj; Stoper kroglica; Drugo
da: Ledningsfastgørelsessystem: Karabinhage; Krog; Skiftebold; Andet
th: ระบบยึดสายไฟ: คาราบิเนอร์; ตะขอ; บอลยึดสายแบบรูด; อื่นๆ
ja: コード固定システム: カラビナ; フック; トグルボール; その他
pt-PT: Sistema de fixação de cabo: Mosquetão; Gancho; Bola de alternar; Outro
it: Sistema di fissaggio del cavo: Moschettone; Gancio; Palla toggle; Altro
el: Σύστημα στερέωσης κορδονιού: Καραμπίνερ; Άγκιστρο; Μπίλια εναλλαγής; Άλλο
ro-RO: Sistem de prindere a corzii: Carabină; Cârlig; Brandenburg; Altele
sv: Fästsystem för sladdar: Karbinhake; Krok; Växla boll; Övrigt
vi: Hệ thống siết dây: Móc khóa đa năng; Móc; Bóng dây rút; Khác
pt-BR: Sistema de fixação de cabo: Mosquetão; Gancho; Corda toggle ball; Outro
pl: System mocowania linki: Karabińczyk; Zaczep; Zapięcie kulkowe; Inne